Mississippi, session 2026, HB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  All agencies, departments, institutions and political subdivisions of the state that provide programs or services to children in this state shall create an itemized list of the programs and services provided by that agency, department, institution or political subdivision.  The itemized list shall provide the following information: (a) A description of the programs and services, categorized by program, target population and geographical region; (b) An itemized resource map of all federal and state funds received for the programs and services; (c) The performance measures used to assess the expenditure of those funds, the intended outcomes of the programs and services and the actual outcomes of the programs and services; (d) Any costs associated with operating the programs and services; and (e) The number of children served by the programs and services. (2) The agencies, departments, institutions and political subdivisions shall provide the itemized lists of the programs and services required by subsection (1) of this section to the John C. Stennis Institute (Stennis Institute) of Government at Mississippi State University not later than September 1 of each year, and the Stennis Institute of Government shall compile the information in those lists into one (1) document, organized both by programs and services and by the agencies, departments, institutions and political subdivisions providing the programs and services.  The Stennis Institute shall make the compiled information available to the Chairperson and Vice Chairperson of the Appropriations, Education and Public Health and Human Services Committees of the Mississippi House of Representatives, and the Appropriations, Education and Public Health and Welfare Committees of the Mississippi Senate by December 1 of each year. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.